District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.36

Injury incurred; initial payments outside United States.

If an employee is injured outside the continental United States, the Mayor may arrange and provide for initial payment of compensation and initial furnishing of other benefits under this subchapter by an employee or agent of the District of Columbia government designated by the Mayor for that purpose in the locality in which the employee was employed or the injury incurred.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2336, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-624.36.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.36.